Illinois, session 104th, HB830.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Telecommunications Excise Tax Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 630/1)  (from Ch. 120, par. 2001)7    Sec. 1. This Article shall be known and and may be cited as 8the "Telecommunications Excise Tax Act". The net proceeds from 9the taxes imposed by this Act shall be used for the support of 10the General Revenue Fund and education.11(Source: P.A. 84-126.)